Illinois, session 104th, HB2378.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/3)  (from Ch. 127, par. 523)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. Unless the context otherwise 8requires, the following words and phrases as used in this Act 9shall have the following meanings. The Department may define 10these and other words and phrases separately for the purpose 11of implementing specific programs providing benefits under 12this Act.13    (a) "Administrative service organization" means any 14person, firm, or corporation experienced in the handling of 15claims which is fully qualified, financially sound, and 16capable of meeting the service requirements of a contract of 17administration executed with the Department.18    (b) "Annuitant" means (1) an employee who retires, or has 19retired, on or after January 1, 1966 on an immediate annuity 20under the provisions of Articles 2, 14 (including an employee 21who has elected to receive an alternative retirement 22cancellation payment under Section 14-108.5 of the Illinois 23Pension Code in lieu of an annuity or who meets the criteria   HB2378- 2 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1for retirement, but in lieu of receiving an annuity under that 2Article has elected to receive an accelerated pension benefit 3payment under Section 14-147.5 of that Article), 15 (including 4an employee who has retired under the optional retirement 5program established under Section 15-158.2 or who meets the 6criteria for retirement but in lieu of receiving an annuity 7under that Article has elected to receive an accelerated 8pension benefit payment under Section 15-185.5 of the 9Article), paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106 10(including an employee who meets the criteria for retirement, 11but in lieu of receiving an annuity under that Article has 12elected to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment 13under Section 16-190.5 of the Illinois Pension Code), or 14Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code; (2) any person who was 15receiving group insurance coverage under this Act as of March 1631, 1978 by reason of his status as an annuitant, even though 17the annuity in relation to which such coverage was provided is 18a proportional annuity based on less than the minimum period 19of service required for a retirement annuity in the system 20involved; (3) any person not otherwise covered by this Act who 21has retired as a participating member under Article 2 of the 22Illinois Pension Code but is ineligible for the retirement 23annuity under Section 2-119 of the Illinois Pension Code; (4) 24the spouse of any person who is receiving a retirement annuity 25under Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code and who is 26covered under a group health insurance program sponsored by a   HB2378- 3 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1governmental employer other than the State of Illinois and who 2has irrevocably elected to waive his or her coverage under 3this Act and to have his or her spouse considered as the 4"annuitant" under this Act and not as a "dependent"; or (5) an 5employee who retires, or has retired, from a qualified 6position, as determined according to rules promulgated by the 7Director, under a qualified local government, a qualified 8rehabilitation facility, a qualified domestic violence shelter 9or service, or a qualified child advocacy center. (For 10definition of "retired employee", see subsection (p) post).11    (b-5) (Blank).12    (b-6) (Blank).13    (b-7) (Blank).14    (c) "Carrier" means (1) an insurance company, a 15corporation organized under the Limited Health Service 16Organization Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act, a 17partnership, or other nongovernmental organization, which is 18authorized to do group life or group health insurance business 19in Illinois, or (2) the State of Illinois as a self-insurer.20    (d) "Compensation" means salary or wages payable on a 21regular payroll by the State Treasurer on a warrant of the 22State Comptroller out of any State, trust or federal fund, or 23by the Governor of the State through a disbursing officer of 24the State out of a trust or out of federal funds, or by any 25Department out of State, trust, federal, or other funds held 26by the State Treasurer or the Department, to any person for   HB2378- 4 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1personal services currently performed, and ordinary or 2accidental disability benefits under Articles 2, 14, 15 3(including ordinary or accidental disability benefits under 4the optional retirement program established under Section 515-158.2), paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106, or 6Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code, for disability 7incurred after January 1, 1966, or benefits payable under the 8Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 9Diseases Act or benefits payable under a sick pay plan 10established in accordance with Section 36 of the State Finance 11Act. "Compensation" also means salary or wages paid to an 12employee of any qualified local government, qualified 13rehabilitation facility, qualified domestic violence shelter 14or service, or qualified child advocacy center.15    (e) "Commission" means the State Employees Group Insurance 16Advisory Commission authorized by this Act. Commencing July 1, 171984, "Commission" as used in this Act means the Commission on 18Government Forecasting and Accountability as established by 19the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act of 1984.20    (f) "Contributory", when referred to as contributory 21coverage, shall mean optional coverages or benefits elected by 22the member toward the cost of which such member makes 23contribution, or which are funded in whole or in part through 24the acceptance of a reduction in earnings or the foregoing of 25an increase in earnings by an employee, as distinguished from 26noncontributory coverage or benefits which are paid entirely   HB2378- 5 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1by the State of Illinois without reduction of the member's 2salary.3    (g) "Department" means any department, institution, board, 4commission, officer, court, or any agency of the State 5government receiving appropriations and having power to 6certify payrolls to the Comptroller authorizing payments of 7salary and wages against such appropriations as are made by 8the General Assembly from any State fund, or against trust 9funds held by the State Treasurer and includes boards of 10trustees of the retirement systems created by Articles 2, 14, 1115, 16, and 18 of the Illinois Pension Code. "Department" also 12includes the Illinois Comprehensive Health Insurance Board, 13the Board of Examiners established under the Illinois Public 14Accounting Act, and the Illinois Finance Authority.15    (h) "Dependent", when the term is used in the context of 16the health and life plan, means a member's spouse and any child 17(1) from birth to age 26, including an adopted child, a child 18who lives with the member from the time of the placement for 19adoption until entry of an order of adoption, a stepchild or 20adjudicated child, or a child who lives with the member if such 21member is a court appointed guardian of the child or (2) age 19 22or over who has a mental or physical disability from a cause 23originating prior to the age of 19 (age 26 if enrolled as an 24adult child dependent). For the health plan only, the term 25"dependent" also includes (1) any person enrolled prior to the 26effective date of this Section who is dependent upon the   HB2378- 6 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1member to the extent that the member may claim such person as a 2dependent for income tax deduction purposes and (2) any person 3who has received after June 30, 2000 an organ transplant and 4who is financially dependent upon the member and eligible to 5be claimed as a dependent for income tax purposes. A member 6requesting to cover any dependent must provide documentation 7as requested by the Department of Central Management Services 8and file with the Department any and all forms required by the 9Department. 10    (i) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois 11Department of Central Management Services.12    (j) "Eligibility period" means the period of time a member 13has to elect enrollment in programs or to select benefits 14without regard to age, sex, or health.15    (k) "Employee" means and includes each officer or employee 16in the service of a department who (1) receives his 17compensation for service rendered to the department on a 18warrant issued pursuant to a payroll certified by a department 19or on a warrant or check issued and drawn by a department upon 20a trust, federal or other fund or on a warrant issued pursuant 21to a payroll certified by an elected or duly appointed officer 22of the State or who receives payment of the performance of 23personal services on a warrant issued pursuant to a payroll 24certified by a Department and drawn by the Comptroller upon 25the State Treasurer against appropriations made by the General 26Assembly from any fund or against trust funds held by the State   HB2378- 7 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1Treasurer, and (2) is employed full-time or part-time in a 2position normally requiring actual performance of duty during 3not less than 1/2 of a normal work period, as established by 4the Director in cooperation with each department, except that 5persons elected by popular vote will be considered employees 6during the entire term for which they are elected regardless 7of hours devoted to the service of the State, and (3) except 8that "employee" does not include any person who is not 9eligible by reason of such person's employment to participate 10in one of the State retirement systems under Articles 2, 14, 15 11(either the regular Article 15 system or the optional 12retirement program established under Section 15-158.2), or 18, 13or under paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106, of the 14Illinois Pension Code, but such term does include persons who 15are employed during the 6-month qualifying period under 16Article 14 of the Illinois Pension Code. Such term also 17includes any person who (1) after January 1, 1966, is 18receiving ordinary or accidental disability benefits under 19Articles 2, 14, 15 (including ordinary or accidental 20disability benefits under the optional retirement program 21established under Section 15-158.2), paragraph (2), (3), or 22(5) of Section 16-106, or Article 18 of the Illinois Pension 23Code, for disability incurred after January 1, 1966, (2) 24receives total permanent or total temporary disability under 25the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 26Diseases Disease Act as a result of injuries sustained or   HB2378- 8 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1illness contracted in the course of employment with the State 2of Illinois, or (3) is not otherwise covered under this Act and 3has retired as a participating member under Article 2 of the 4Illinois Pension Code but is ineligible for the retirement 5annuity under Section 2-119 of the Illinois Pension Code. 6However, a person who satisfies the criteria of the foregoing 7definition of "employee" except that such person is made 8ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 9System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 10Illinois Pension Code is also an "employee" for the purposes 11of this Act. "Employee" also includes any person receiving or 12eligible for benefits under a sick pay plan established in 13accordance with Section 36 of the State Finance Act. 14"Employee" also includes (i) each officer or employee in the 15service of a qualified local government, including persons 16appointed as trustees of sanitary districts regardless of 17hours devoted to the service of the sanitary district, (ii) 18each employee in the service of a qualified rehabilitation 19facility, (iii) each full-time employee in the service of a 20qualified domestic violence shelter or service, and (iv) each 21full-time employee in the service of a qualified child 22advocacy center, as determined according to rules promulgated 23by the Director.24    (l) "Member" means an employee, annuitant, retired 25employee, or survivor. In the case of an annuitant or retired 26employee who first becomes an annuitant or retired employee on   HB2378- 9 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1or after January 13, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 297-668), the individual must meet the minimum vesting 3requirements of the applicable retirement system in order to 4be eligible for group insurance benefits under that system. In 5the case of a survivor who is not entitled to occupational 6death benefits pursuant to an applicable retirement system or 7death benefits pursuant to the Illinois Workers' Compensation 8Act, and who first becomes a survivor on or after January 13, 92012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-668), the deceased 10employee, annuitant, or retired employee upon whom the annuity 11is based must have been eligible to participate in the group 12insurance system under the applicable retirement system in 13order for the survivor to be eligible for group insurance 14benefits under that system. 15    In the case of a survivor who is entitled to occupational 16death benefits pursuant to the deceased employee's applicable 17retirement system or death benefits pursuant to the Illinois 18Workers' Compensation Act, and first becomes a survivor on or 19after January 1, 2022, the survivor is eligible for group 20health insurance benefits regardless of the deceased 21employee's minimum vesting requirements under the applicable 22retirement system, with a State contribution rate of 100%, 23until an unmarried child dependent reaches the age of 18, or 24the age of 22 if the dependent child is a full-time student, or 25until the adult survivor becomes eligible for benefits under 26the federal Medicare health insurance program (Title XVIII of   HB2378- 10 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1the Social Security Act, as added by Public Law 89-97). In the 2case of a survivor currently receiving occupational death 3benefits pursuant to the deceased employee's applicable 4retirement system or has received death benefits pursuant to 5the Illinois Workers' Compensation Act, who first became a 6survivor prior to January 1, 2022, the survivor is eligible 7for group health insurance benefits regardless of the deceased 8employee's minimum vesting requirements under the applicable 9retirement system, with a State contribution rate of 100%, 10until an unmarried child dependent reaches the age of 18, or 11the age of 22 if the dependent child is a full-time student, or 12until the adult survivor becomes eligible for benefits under 13the federal Medicare health insurance program (Title XVIII of 14the Social Security Act, as added by Public Law 89-97). The 15changes made by Public Act 102-714 this amendatory Act of the 16102nd General Assembly with respect to survivors who first 17became survivors prior to January 1, 2022 shall apply upon 18request of the survivor on or after April 29, 2022 (the 19effective date of Public Act 102-714) this amendatory Act of 20the 102nd General Assembly. 21    (m) "Optional coverages or benefits" means those coverages 22or benefits available to the member on his or her voluntary 23election, and at his or her own expense.24    (n) "Program" means the group life insurance, health 25benefits, and other employee benefits designed and contracted 26for by the Director under this Act.  HB2378- 11 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1    (o) "Health plan" means a health benefits program offered 2by the State of Illinois for persons eligible for the plan.3    (p) "Retired employee" means any person who would be an 4annuitant as that term is defined herein but for the fact that 5such person retired prior to January 1, 1966. Such term also 6includes any person formerly employed by the University of 7Illinois in the Cooperative Extension Service who would be an 8annuitant but for the fact that such person was made 9ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 10System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 11Illinois Pension Code.12    (q) "Survivor" means a person receiving an annuity as a 13survivor of an employee or of an annuitant. "Survivor" also 14includes: (1) the surviving dependent of a person who 15satisfies the definition of "employee" except that such person 16is made ineligible to participate in the State Universities 17Retirement System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 1815-107 of the Illinois Pension Code; (2) the surviving 19dependent of any person formerly employed by the University of 20Illinois in the Cooperative Extension Service who would be an 21annuitant except for the fact that such person was made 22ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 23System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 24Illinois Pension Code; (3) the surviving dependent of a person 25who was an annuitant under this Act by virtue of receiving an 26alternative retirement cancellation payment under Section   HB2378- 12 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b114-108.5 of the Illinois Pension Code; and (4) a person who 2would be receiving an annuity as a survivor of an annuitant 3except that the annuitant elected on or after June 4, 2018 to 4receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under Section 514-147.5, 15-185.5, or 16-190.5 of the Illinois Pension Code 6in lieu of receiving an annuity.7    (q-2) "SERS" means the State Employees' Retirement System 8of Illinois, created under Article 14 of the Illinois Pension 9Code. 10    (q-3) "SURS" means the State Universities Retirement 11System, created under Article 15 of the Illinois Pension Code. 12    (q-4) "TRS" means the Teachers' Retirement System of the 13State of Illinois, created under Article 16 of the Illinois 14Pension Code. 15    (q-5) (Blank). 16    (q-6) (Blank).17    (q-7) (Blank).18    (r) "Medical services" means the services provided within 19the scope of their licenses by practitioners in all categories 20licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.21    (s) "Unit of local government" means any county, 22municipality, township, school district (including a 23combination of school districts under the Intergovernmental 24Cooperation Act), special district or other unit, designated 25as a unit of local government by law, which exercises limited 26governmental powers or powers in respect to limited   HB2378- 13 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1governmental subjects, any not-for-profit association with a 2membership that primarily includes townships and township 3officials, that has duties that include provision of research 4service, dissemination of information, and other acts for the 5purpose of improving township government, and that is funded 6wholly or partly in accordance with Section 85-15 of the 7Township Code; any not-for-profit corporation or association, 8with a membership consisting primarily of municipalities, that 9operates its own utility system, and provides research, 10training, dissemination of information, or other acts to 11promote cooperation between and among municipalities that 12provide utility services and for the advancement of the goals 13and purposes of its membership; the Southern Illinois 14Collegiate Common Market, which is a consortium of higher 15education institutions in Southern Illinois; the Illinois 16Association of Park Districts; and any hospital provider that 17is owned by a county that has 100 or fewer hospital beds and 18has not already joined the program. "Qualified local 19government" means a unit of local government approved by the 20Director and participating in a program created under 21subsection (i) of Section 10 of this Act.22    (t) "Qualified rehabilitation facility" means any 23not-for-profit organization that is accredited by the 24Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities or 25certified by the Department of Human Services (as successor to 26the Department of Mental Health and Developmental   HB2378- 14 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1Disabilities) to provide services to persons with disabilities 2and which receives funds from the State of Illinois for 3providing those services, approved by the Director and 4participating in a program created under subsection (j) of 5Section 10 of this Act.6    (u) "Qualified domestic violence shelter or service" means 7any Illinois domestic violence shelter or service and its 8administrative offices funded by the Department of Human 9Services (as successor to the Illinois Department of Public 10Aid), approved by the Director and participating in a program 11created under subsection (k) of Section 10.12    (v) "TRS benefit recipient" means a person who:13        (1) is not a "member" as defined in this Section; and14        (2) is receiving a monthly benefit or retirement 15    annuity under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code or 16    would be receiving such monthly benefit or retirement 17    annuity except that the benefit recipient elected on or 18    after June 4, 2018 to receive an accelerated pension 19    benefit payment under Section 16-190.5 of the Illinois 20    Pension Code in lieu of receiving an annuity; and21        (3) either (i) has at least 8 years of creditable 22    service under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code, or 23    (ii) was enrolled in the health insurance program offered 24    under that Article on January 1, 1996, or (iii) is the 25    survivor of a benefit recipient who had at least 8 years of 26    creditable service under Article 16 of the Illinois   HB2378- 15 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1    Pension Code or was enrolled in the health insurance 2    program offered under that Article on June 21, 1995 (the 3    effective date of Public Act 89-25), or (iv) is a 4    recipient or survivor of a recipient of a disability 5    benefit under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code.6    (w) "TRS dependent beneficiary" means a person who:7        (1) is not a "member" or "dependent" as defined in 8    this Section; and9        (2) is a TRS benefit recipient's: (A) spouse, (B) 10    dependent parent who is receiving at least half of his or 11    her support from the TRS benefit recipient, or (C) 12    natural, step, adjudicated, or adopted child who is (i) 13    under age 26, (ii) was, on January 1, 1996, participating 14    as a dependent beneficiary in the health insurance program 15    offered under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code, or 16    (iii) age 19 or over who has a mental or physical 17    disability from a cause originating prior to the age of 19 18    (age 26 if enrolled as an adult child).19    "TRS dependent beneficiary" does not include, as indicated 20under paragraph (2) of this subsection (w), a dependent of the 21survivor of a TRS benefit recipient who first becomes a 22dependent of a survivor of a TRS benefit recipient on or after 23January 13, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-668) 24unless that dependent would have been eligible for coverage as 25a dependent of the deceased TRS benefit recipient upon whom 26the survivor benefit is based.   HB2378- 16 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1    (x) "Military leave" refers to individuals in basic 2training for reserves, special/advanced training, annual 3training, emergency call up, activation by the President of 4the United States, or any other training or duty in service to 5the United States Armed Forces.6    (y) (Blank).7    (z) "Community college benefit recipient" means a person 8who:9        (1) is not a "member" as defined in this Section; and10        (2) is receiving retirement income from a self-managed 11    plan account under Section 15-158.2 of the Illinois 12    Pension Code or is receiving a monthly survivor's annuity 13    or retirement annuity under Article 15 of the Illinois 14    Pension Code or would be receiving such monthly survivor's 15    annuity or retirement annuity except that the benefit 16    recipient elected on or after June 4, 2018 to receive an 17    accelerated pension benefit payment under Section 15-185.5 18    of the Illinois Pension Code in lieu of receiving an 19    annuity; and20        (3) either (i) was a full-time employee of a community 21    college district or an association of community college 22    boards created under the Public Community College Act 23    (other than an employee whose last employer under Article 24    15 of the Illinois Pension Code was a community college 25    district subject to Article VII of the Public Community 26    College Act) and was eligible to participate in a group   HB2378- 17 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1    health benefit plan as an employee during the time of 2    employment with a community college district (other than a 3    community college district subject to Article VII of the 4    Public Community College Act) or an association of 5    community college boards, or (ii) is the survivor of a 6    person described in item (i).7    (aa) "Community college dependent beneficiary" means a 8person who:9        (1) is not a "member" or "dependent" as defined in 10    this Section; and11        (2) is a community college benefit recipient's: (A) 12    spouse, (B) dependent parent who is receiving at least 13    half of his or her support from the community college 14    benefit recipient, or (C) natural, step, adjudicated, or 15    adopted child who is (i) under age 26, or (ii) age 19 or 16    over and has a mental or physical disability from a cause 17    originating prior to the age of 19 (age 26 if enrolled as 18    an adult child).19    "Community college dependent beneficiary" does not 20include, as indicated under paragraph (2) of this subsection 21(aa), a dependent of the survivor of a community college 22benefit recipient who first becomes a dependent of a survivor 23of a community college benefit recipient on or after January 2413, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-668) unless that 25dependent would have been eligible for coverage as a dependent 26of the deceased community college benefit recipient upon whom   HB2378- 18 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1the survivor annuity is based. 2    (bb) "Qualified child advocacy center" means any Illinois 3child advocacy center and its administrative offices funded by 4the Department of Children and Family Services, as defined by 5the Children's Advocacy Center Act (55 ILCS 80/), approved by 6the Director and participating in a program created under 7subsection (n) of Section 10. 8    (cc) "Placement for adoption" means the assumption and 9retention by a member of a legal obligation for total or 10partial support of a child in anticipation of adoption of the 11child. The child's placement with the member terminates upon 12the termination of such legal obligation. 13(Source: P.A. 101-242, eff. 8-9-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 14102-714, eff. 4-29-22; 102-813, eff 5-13-22; revised 7-23-24.) 15    Section 10. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 16changing Section 15-132.2 as follows: 17    (40 ILCS 5/15-132.2)18    Sec. 15-132.2. Retire and retirement. A participant 19"retires", and his or her "retirement" begins, when his or her 20annuity payment period begins. A participant in the 21self-managed plan "retires", and the participant's 22"retirement" begins, when the participant is eligible for 23retirement under this Article, and Article 20 if applicable, 24and the participant begins receiving retirement income from   HB2378- 19 -LRB104 08928 RPS 18983 b1the participant's self-managed plan account. 2(Source: P.A. 91-887, eff. 7-6-00.)